Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 1 General Contracting Provisions

Effective date. —

This part became effective July 1, 2021.

32-2-60.
Authority to contract; form and content of construction contracts; bonds.

The department shall have the authority to contract as set forth in this article and in Code Section 32-2-2. All department construction contracts shall be in writing. Any contract entered into by the department for the construction of a public road shall include, as a cost of the project, provisions for sowing vegetation, if appropriate, on all banks, fills, cuts, ditches, and other places where soil erosion is likely to result from the necessary incidents to road work along the right of way of the road project.

Persons, firms, or corporations submitting bids on department construction contracts are required to examine the site of the proposed work and determine for themselves the anticipated subsurface and latent physical conditions at the site prior to submitting a bid on the project. The submission of a bid shall be prima-facie evidence that the bidder has made such examination and is satisfied as to the conditions to be encountered in performing the work. The department does not in any way guarantee the amount or nature of subsurface materials which may be encountered and which must be excavated, graded, or driven through in performing the work on the project. The contractor shall not plead deception or misunderstanding because of variations from quantities of work to be performed or materials to be furnished as shown on the plans or minor variations from the locations or character of the work. Payment will be made only for actual quantities of work performed in accordance with the plans and specifications. The department shall not provide compensation above the amount bid on such project solely due to the encountering of subsurface or latent physical conditions at the site which are different from those anticipated by the bidder.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, the department reserves the right to make, at any time during the progress of work, such increases or decreases in quantities and such alterations in the details of construction as necessary or desirable to satisfactorily complete the work. Such increases or decreases shall not invalidate the contract nor release the surety and the contractor agrees to perform the work as altered.

Whenever an alteration materially increases or decreases the scope of the work specified in the contract, a supplemental agreement acceptable to both parties shall be made. In the absence of a supplemental agreement acceptable to both parties, the department may direct that the work be done either by force account or at existing contract prices. Any force account agreement shall be in writing, specifying the terms of payment signed by the chief engineer, and agreed to in writing by the contractor.

Changes made by the engineer will not be considered to waive any of the provisions of the contract, nor may the contractor make any claim for loss of anticipated profits because of the changes, or by reason of any variation between the approximate quantities and the quantities of work as done.

When the estimated amount of any department construction contract exceeds $300 million, performance and payment bonds shall be required in the amount of at least the total amount payable by the terms of the contract unless the department, after public notice, makes a written determination supported by specific findings that single bonds in such amount are not reasonably available, and the board approves such determination in a public meeting. In such event, the estimated value of the construction portion of the contract, excluding right of way acquisition and engineering, shall be guaranteed by a combination of security including, but not limited to, the following:

Payment, performance, surety, cosurety, or excess layer surety bonds;

Letters of credit;

Guarantees of the contractor or its parent companies;

Obligations of the United States and of its agencies and instrumentalities; or

Cash collateral;

provided, however, that the aggregate total guarantee of the project may not use a corporate guarantee of more than 35 percent. The combination of such guarantees shall be determined at the discretion of the department, subject to the approval of the board; provided, however, that such aggregate guarantees shall include not less than $300 million of performance and payment bonds and shall equal not less than 100 percent of the contractor’s obligation under the construction portion of the contract.

Payment guarantees approved pursuant to this subsection shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of Code Section 13-10-61. Contractors requesting payment under construction contracts guaranteed pursuant to this subsection shall provide the following certification under oath with each such request: “All payments due to subcontractors and suppliers from previous payment received under the contract have been made, and timely payments will be made from the proceeds of the payment covered by this certification.”

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 628, § 1; Code 1933, § 95A-801, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1908, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 591, § 5; Ga. L. 2006, p. 663, § 1/HB 1177; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 32/SB 103; Ga. L. 2018, p. 372, § 1/SB 445.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted former subsection (d), which read: “The provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section shall be applicable only to federal-aid highway contracts.”; and redesignated former subsection (e) as present subsection (d).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “limited to, the following:” was substituted for “limited to the following:” near the end of the introductory paragraph of subsection (e) (now subsection (d)), “Guarantees” was substituted for “Guaranties” in paragraph (e)(3) (now subparagraph (d)(1)(C)), and in paragraph (e)(5) (now subparagraph (d)(1)(E)), “collateral; provided, however,” was substituted for “collateral. (6) Provided however” and “percent” was substituted for “%”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 1908, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The provisions of this Act shall not be applicable to or affect existing contracts in effect on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective April 14, 1988.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 1908, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “No provision of this Act shall prohibit any court of law or equity from reforming a contract or awarding damages based upon a mutual mistake of fact or fraud in the inception of a contract or its performance.”

32-2-61.
Limitations on power to contract.

The department is expressly prohibited from making or contracting any debts or entering into any contract for which it does not have sufficient funds appropriated at the time of making said debt or entering into said contract to enable it to meet such debt or such contract obligation. However, such prohibition shall not apply to contracts entered into pursuant to Article IX, Section III, Paragraph I and Article VII, Section IV, Paragraph IV of the Constitution of Georgia; and the department is expressly authorized to enter into such contracts and to obligate the department in connection therewith. For the purpose of paying obligations imposed by any such contract, such funds as may be appropriated to the department for activities incident to providing and maintaining an adequate system of public roads in the state and the cost incident thereto may be pledged by the department.

The board shall not enter into any lease contract if:

The aggregates of all lease rentals from that and all other such lease contracts including the contract or contracts proposed to be entered into exceed $19,900,000.00 per annum or 15 percent of the funds appropriated to the department in the fiscal year immediately preceding entering into any such lease rental contract, whichever is greater; or

Such lease contract constitutes security for bonds or other obligations issued by the lessor.

The execution of any lease contract is prohibited until the General Assembly has specifically provided funds in an appropriations Act for the payment of at least one year’s rental under such contract.

Except as authorized by Article 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 50, the department is prohibited from entering into any contract for the purchase of supplies, materials, equipment, or services, except those services ancillary to the construction and maintenance of a public road.

The department is prohibited from negotiating any contract for the construction or maintenance of a public road involving the expenditure of $200,000.00 or more except any contract:

With counties, municipalities, and state agencies, provided that such negotiated contract shall be made at the average bid price of the same kind of work let to contract after advertisement during a period of 60 days prior to the making of the contract;

With a railroad company or utility concerning relocation of its tracks or facilities where the same are not then located on a public road and such relocation is necessary as an incident to the construction or improvement of a public road. However, nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed as requiring the department to furnish a site or right of way for railroad or railway lines or tracks or utility facilities required to be removed from a public road. Furthermore, this subsection shall not prevent the department from assisting in the removal and relocation of publicly owned utilities from locations on public roads as provided in Code Section 32-6-170;

For emergency construction or maintenance involving the expenditure of $200,000.00 or more when the public interest requires that the work be done without the delay of advertising for public bids;

For the procurement of business, professional, or other services from any person, firm, or corporation as an independent contractor;

With the State Road and Tollway Authority; or

Through the provisions of a design-build contract as provided for in Code Section 32-2-81.

A department contract negotiated and made with a political subdivision, as authorized by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, may be subcontracted to any person or political subdivision. It may be performed with inmate labor, except in the case of a public work constructed with federal aid, or the forces of such political subdivision or those of a political subdivision to which such contract has been subcontracted. However, the department shall have the authority to furnish planning, contract plans, specifications, and engineering supervision over a public road being constructed by a political subdivision or by its subcontractor. Any subcontract made under authority of this subsection shall not constitute the basis of any claim against the department, nor shall such subcontract be considered an assignment of the rights of the political subdivision under its contract with the department.

Except for public roads within and leading to state parks, the department is prohibited from maintaining any public road not on the state highway system. Any department contract with a state agency or political subdivision for construction of a public road not then, nor to become upon completion of the contract, part of the state highway system or a road within or leading to a state park shall not relieve the agency or the political subdivision of the responsibility for maintaining such public road as such duty is imposed by this Code section and by Code Sections 32-4-41 and 32-4-91.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 62, § 12; Ga. L. 1951, p. 31, § 3; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 81, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 249, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 22, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 382, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1055, § 5; Code 1933, § 95A-802, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 19; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1159, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 56; Ga. L. 1989, p. 356, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 699, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 905, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 117, § 30A/HB 312; Ga. L. 2007, p. 167, § 1/HB 192; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1343, § 1/HB 817.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, “subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1)” was substituted for “subparagraph (1)(A)” in the first sentence of paragraph (d)(2).

32-2-62.
Advertising of nonnegotiated construction contracts; approval of negotiated construction contracts; factors to be considered by board for priority of projects.

The advertising of all nonnegotiated department construction contracts shall have the prior approval of the board. When the board is not in session, the commissioner may approve negotiated construction contracts. In determining public roads most in need of work and also the type, class, width, location, and order of priority of each project, the board shall take into consideration such factors as the use of the public road in question; the present need and anticipated development of the area traversed by it; whether or not it is a school bus or mail route; and its use for agricultural or industrial purposes. The board shall also take into consideration the information disclosed by the records required by Code Section 32-4-2 to be maintained by the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-803, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-2-63.
Authority of commissioner to execute contracts and authority lease agreements.

The commissioner shall have full authority to execute contracts and authority lease agreements on behalf of the department whenever such contracts or agreements have been approved in accordance with this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-804, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-2-64.
Required letting of contracts by public bid; posting bid on department website sufficient.

Except as authorized by subsection (d) of Code Section 32-2-61, all department construction and maintenance contracts shall be let by public bid. For purposes of this Code section, posting a bid on the department’s website shall satisfy the public bid requirement.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 372, § 2; Code 1933, § 95A-805, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1343, § 2/HB 817.

Cross references.

Letting of contracts by Department of Administrative Services by public bid, §

50-5-67

.

32-2-65.
Advertising for bids.

On all contracts required to be let by public bid, the commissioner shall advertise for competitive bids for at least two weeks; the public advertisement shall be inserted once a week in such newspapers or other publications, or both, as will ensure adequate publicity, the first insertion to be at least two weeks prior to the opening of bids, the second to follow one week after the publication of the first insertion; provided, however, that the advertisement requirement provided in this Code section shall be satisfied by posting the required information on the department’s website for the required time period.

Such advertisement shall include but not be limited to the following items:

A description sufficient to enable the public to know the approximate extent and character of the work to be done;

The time allowed for performance;

The terms and time of payment, including a statement that final payment of amounts withheld or deposited in escrow need not be made until the issuance of the chief engineer’s certification of satisfactory completion of work and acceptance thereof, as provided in Code Sections 32-2-75 through 32-2-77;

Where and under what conditions and costs the detailed plans and specifications and proposal forms may be obtained;

The amount of the required proposal guaranty, if one is required;

The time and place for submission and opening of bids;

The right of the department to reject any one or all bids; and

Such further notice as the department may deem advisable as in the public interest.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 373, § 3; Code 1933, § 95A-806, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 591, § 6; Ga. L. 2018, p. 372, § 2/SB 445; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 2/HB 577.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added the proviso at the end of subsection (a).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added “, if one is required” at the end of paragraph (b)(5).

32-2-66.
Prequalifications of contractors and subcontractors.

In order to establish a list of reliable persons qualified to bid on a department contract or to subcontract with such persons and to ensure that the contract may be awarded to the lowest reliable bidder, the department may adopt and publish in print or electronically uniform and reasonable rules and regulations which may include but not be limited to the following:

A requirement that every contractor desiring to be qualified to bid or subcontract file with the department an application including, among other information: a financial statement; a complete questionnaire regarding the contractor’s organization and the work performed by such contractor; and a statement of equipment owned or leased by such contractor;

Conditions under which a contractor or subcontractor may become disqualified to bid or to subcontract;

Procedures for assigning maximum capacity ratings to contractors and subcontractors; and

Provisions for waiving prequalification of contractors for construction of specialty items. For the purpose of this paragraph, “specialty items” means work that requires highly specialized knowledge, craftsmanship, or equipment not ordinarily available in the type of contracting organizations qualified and expected to bid on the contract as a whole.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-807, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

32-2-67.
Payment by bidder to cover costs.

A bidder shall be required to pay to the department a reasonable sum sufficient to cover the cost to the department of copies of the bid proposal form of the department, the standard specifications of the department, and the plans of the contract if such plans are required because the particular contract calls for construction.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-808, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-2-68.
Proposal guaranty by bidder.

No bid for capital construction or capital maintenance will be considered by the department unless it is accompanied by a proposal guaranty in the form of a certified check or other acceptable security payable to the treasurer of the department for an amount deemed by the department to be in the public interest and necessary to ensure that the successful bidder will execute the contract bid upon.

A proposal guaranty will be returned to a bidder upon receipt by the department of the bidder’s written withdrawal of his bid if such receipt is before the time scheduled for the opening of bids. Upon the determination by the department of the lowest reliable bidder, the department will return the proposal guaranties to all bidders except that of the lowest reliable bidder. If no contract award is made within 30 days after the date set for the opening of bids, all bids shall be rejected and all proposal guaranties shall be returned unless the department and the successful bidder agree in writing to a longer period of time.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-809, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 3/HB 577.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (a), inserted “for capital construction or capital maintenance” near the beginning, and substituted “contract bid upon” for “contract on which he bid” at the end.

32-2-69.
Bidding process and award of contract.

Except as authorized by Code Sections 32-2-79, 32-2-80, and 32-2-82, the department shall award contracts to the lowest reliable bidder, provided that the department shall have the right to reject any and all such bids whether such right is reserved in the public notice or not and, in such case, the department may readvertise, perform the work itself, or abandon the project.

If only one bid is received, the department shall open and read the bid. If the bid is at or below the department’s cost estimate for the project as certified by the chief engineer, such cost estimate shall be read immediately and publicly. If the bid exceeds the department’s cost estimate for the project, the department may negotiate with the bidder to establish a fair and reasonable price for the contract, provided that the resulting negotiated contract price is not greater than the bid and that the department’s cost estimate is disclosed to the bidder prior to the beginning of the negotiations. For purposes of this Code section, posting of a bid on the department’s website shall be equivalent to having read the bid.

If the department made errors in the bidding documents which resulted in an unbalanced bid, the department may negotiate with the lowest reliable bidder to correct such errors, provided that the lowest reliable bidder is not changed.

If the lowest reliable bidder is released by the department because of an obvious error or if the lowest reliable bidder refuses to accept the contract and thereby forfeits the bid bond, the department may award the contract to the next lowest reliable bidder, readvertise, perform the work itself, or abandon the project.

The signed, notarized affidavit required in subsection (b) of Code Section 13-10-91 shall be submitted to the department prior to the award of any contract.

The department shall provide by rule and regulation for a procedure to appeal the rejection of any bid for contracts the department is authorized to enter into under this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-810, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 153, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 591, § 7; Ga. L. 2003, p. 905, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1343, § 3/HB 817; Ga. L. 2018, p. 372, § 3/SB 445; Ga. L. 2020, p. 371, § 2/HB 1098; Ga. L. 2021, p. 480, § 2/HB 588; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 4/HB 577.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added subsection (f).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, substituted “award contracts” for “award the contract” in the beginning of subsection (a); added the last sentence to subsection (b); deleted former subsection (e), which read: “For the purposes of this Code section, posting a bid on the department’s website shall be equivalent to having read the bid.”; redesignated former subsection (f) as present subsection (e); and added subsection (f).

The 2021 amendments.

The first 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “32-2-79, 32-2-80, and 32-2-82,” for “32-2-79 and 32-2-80” in subsection (a). The second 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, made identical changes.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 170 (2003).

32-2-70.
Bonds of successful bidder.

Where the contract price exceeds $100,000.00, no department construction contract shall be valid unless the contractor first gives:

The performance and payment bonds in accordance with Chapter 10 of Title 13; and

Such other bonds or insurance policies required by the department in its proposal forms, including but not limited to public liability and property damage insurance bonds or policies.

Public procurement officers shall accept electronic signatures and electronic corporate seals on bonds issued pursuant to this Code section so long as such signatures and seals comply with the provisions of Chapter 12 of Title 10 and Code Section 33-24-14.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-811, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 32; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 2; Ga. L. 2007, p. 167, § 2/HB 192; Ga. L. 2021, p. 459, § 2-1/SB 169.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 4, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 32, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 2.
See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, 08.31.20.02, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and
05.28.21.02.

32-2-71.
Failure of successful bidder to sign contract or furnish bonds.

If the successful bidder fails to sign the contract or furnish the bonds or policies required by Code Section 32-2-70, the proposal guaranty will become the property of the department as liquidated damages. The contract then may be readvertised or the project may be abandoned.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-812, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-2-72.
Oath by successful bidder.

A successful bidder, before commencing the work, shall execute a written oath, as required by subsection (e) of Code Section 36-91-21, stating that he or she has not violated such Code section which makes it unlawful to restrict competitive bidding.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-813, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 7; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 3.

32-2-73.
Supplemental and extension agreements.

The department shall be authorized to execute supplemental agreements to the original contract covering changes or revised or new unit prices and items and supplementing the original contract not to exceed a 20 percent increase in cost of the project and to execute extension agreements affecting the length of the project which may be increased by adding sections to said project or by relocation of said project not to exceed 20 percent of the total length of the project or 20 percent of total contract cost.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 373, § 4; Code 1933, § 95A-814, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-2-74.
Effect of federal laws on Code Sections 32-2-60 through 32-2-73; power of department to secure benefits of federal-aid program.

Nothing in Code Sections 32-2-60 through 32-2-73 is intended to conflict with any federal law; and, in case of such conflict, such portion of those Code sections as may be in conflict with such federal law is declared of no effect to the extent of the conflict.

The department is authorized to take the necessary steps to secure the full benefit of the federal-aid program and to meet any contingencies not provided for in Code Sections 32-2-60 through 32-2-73, abiding at all times by a fundamental purpose to plan, survey, construct, reconstruct, maintain, improve, and pave as economically as possible those public roads of Georgia which, under the terms of Code Sections 32-2-60 through 32-2-73, are most in need of such construction or work in such a manner as will best promote the interest, welfare, and progress of the citizens of Georgia.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-815, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-2-75.
Contract clauses for retainage of amounts constituting a percentage of gross value of completed work; time of final payment of retained amounts to contractor.

As used in this Code section and Code Sections 32-2-76 and 32-2-77, the term:

“Engineer” means the chief engineer or the engineer designated by the Georgia Highway Authority or the State Road and Tollway Authority.

“Escrow account” means the certificates of deposit issued by a state or national bank in Georgia and any uninvested cash held in escrow.

“State” means the Department of Transportation, the Georgia Highway Authority, or the State Road and Tollway Authority.

“Treasurer” means the treasurer of the Department of Transportation, the treasurer of the Georgia Highway Authority, or the treasurer of the State Road and Tollway Authority.

The state is authorized to insert a clause in the specifications of all contracts let and awarded as a result of public lettings for the construction, improvement, maintenance, or repair of any road, highway, bridge, or appurtenance thereto providing for the retainage of amounts constituting a percentage of the gross value of the completed work as may be provided for in the contract.

Final payment of the retained amounts to the contractor under the contract to which the retained amount relates will be made after certification by the engineer that the work has been satisfactorily completed and is accepted in accordance with the contract, plans, and specifications.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 635, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Ga. L. 1994, p. 591, § 8; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 2-1.

Cross references.

Authorization and procedure for retention of contractual payments by state or political subdivisions; procedure for final payment, §

13-10-81

.

Georgia Highway Authority, §

32-10-1

et seq.

State Road and Tollway Authority, §

32-10-60

et seq.

32-2-76.
Contract clauses providing for escrow agreements; mandatory provisions of escrow agreements.

In lieu of the retained amounts provided for in Code Section 32-2-75, the state is authorized to insert a clause in the specifications of all contracts let and awarded as a result of public lettings for the construction, improvement, maintenance, or repair of any road, highway, bridge, or appurtenance thereto providing for the maintenance of an escrow account in an amount at least equal to the amount of the retainage authorized by the contract, in accordance with such rules and regulations as are authorized to be promulgated by the state.

Any such escrow agreement entered into pursuant to this Code section must contain as a minimum the following provisions:

Only state or national banks chartered within this state may serve as an escrow agent;

The escrow agent must limit the investment of funds of the contractor held in escrow in lieu of retained amounts provided for in Code Section 32-2-75 to negotiable certificates of deposits issued by any state or national bank in this state, including but not limited to certificates of deposit issued by the bank acting as escrow agent, registered in the name of the escrow agent as such under escrow agreement with the contractor;

As interest on certificates of deposits held in escrow becomes due, it shall be collected by the escrow agent and paid to the contractor;

The escrow agent shall promptly acknowledge to the treasurer of the department or the appropriate authority the amount and value of the escrow account held by the escrow agent, and any additions to the escrow account shall be reported immediately. Withdrawals from the escrow account shall only be made subject to the written approval of the treasurer of the department or the appropriate authority;

Upon default or overpayment, as determined by the state, of any contract subject to this procedure and upon the written demand of the treasurer of the department or the appropriate authority, the escrow agent shall within ten days deliver a certified check to the treasurer of the department or the appropriate authority in the amount of the escrow account balance relating to the contract in default;

The escrow account may be terminated upon completion and acceptance of the contract(s) as provided in Code Section 32-2-75;

All fees and expenses of the escrow agent shall be paid by the contractor to the escrow agent and if not paid shall constitute a lien on the interest accruing to the escrow account and shall be paid therefrom;

The escrow account shall constitute a specific pledge to the state, and the contractor shall not, except to his surety, otherwise assign, pledge, discount, sell, or transfer his interest in said escrow account, the funds in which shall not be subject to levy, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever; and

The form of the escrow agreement and provisions thereof in compliance with this Code section as well as such other provisions as the treasurer of the department or the appropriate authority shall from time to time prescribe shall be subject to written approval of the treasurer of the department or the appropriate authority. The approval of the escrow agreement by the treasurer of the department or the appropriate authority shall authorize the escrow agent to accept appointment in such capacity.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 635, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32.

32-2-77.
Liability of treasurer of the department or other appropriate authority and state to contractor or surety.

Neither the treasurer of the department or the appropriate authority nor the state shall be liable to the contractor or his surety for the failure of the escrow agent to perform under the escrow agreement, or for the failure of any bank to honor certificates of deposits issued by it which are held in the escrow account.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 635, § 3.